District of Columbia statutes.
15-354

Stay.

(a)

Upon proof that the judgment debtor has furnished the security for the satisfaction of the judgment required by the state in which the judgment is rendered, and if the judgment debtor shows the Superior Court that an appeal from the foreign judgment is pending or shall be taken or that a stay of execution has been granted, the Superior Court shall stay enforcement of the foreign judgment until:

(1)

The appeal is concluded;

(2)

The time for appeal expires; or

(3)

The stay of execution expires or is vacated.

(b)

If the judgment debtor shows the Superior Court any ground upon which enforcement of a judgment of the Superior Court would be stayed, the Superior Court shall stay enforcement of the foreign judgment for an appropriate period upon requiring the same security for satisfaction of a judgment that is required in the District.

Oct. 2, 1990, D.C. Law 8-173, § 2(b), 37 DCR 5005
1981 Ed., § 15-354.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 4 of the Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act (1964).